Massachusetts, session 194th, H921.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 360 of the acts of 1984 is hereby amended by inserting
after the word “lands”, in lines 2 and 5, the word:- “, waters”.
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 360 is hereby further amended by inserting at
the end thereof the following clause:- (m) All lands, waters and buildings acquired, leased or
administratively controlled by the National Park Service on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of said chapter 360 of the acts of 1984 is hereby amended by
inserting at the end thereof the following:- Concurrent jurisdiction over any lands, waters or
buildings under clause (m) of section 1 shall vest in the United States of America when the
of 2

Director of the National Park Service files a notice of such acceptance with the governor and
state secretary.
of 2